Florida, session 2026, HB303.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (h) is added to subsection (1) of
section 464.019, Florida Statutes, to read:
464.019 Approval of nursing education programs.—
(1) PROGRAM APPLICATION.—An educational institution that
wishes to conduct a program in this state for the prelicensure
education of professional or practical nurses must submit to the
department a program application and review fee of $1,000 for
each prelicensure nursing education program to be offered at the
institution's main campus, branch campus, or other instructional
site. The program application must include the legal name of the
educational institution, the legal name of the nursing education
program, and, if such institution is accredited, the name of the
accrediting agency. The application must also document that:
(h)1. The professional or practical nursing education
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb303-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 303 2026
program requires students to complete a 2-hour course on human
trafficking that meets the requirements of s. 464.013(3)(c) as
part of its core curriculum. The course must be approved by the
board.
2. Students must complete the course before graduating
from the program.

The board, in coordination with the department, shall oversee
implementation and enforcement of this paragraph and consult
with human trafficking advocacy organizations and local law
enforcement agencies to ensure that the course curriculum
offered by nursing education programs remains consistent with
current laws and best practices and aligns with existing human
trafficking education efforts. This paragraph applies to
students who enroll in a nursing education program on or after
July 1, 2027.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb303-00